src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ############################## !
!! !!!North Saami numerals 
! ############################## !




! Numerals
! ========

!! !!The initial lexica
! ------------------

LEXICON Numeral   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  initial lexica
                       MILJON           ; ! a noun of its own
                       UNDERDUHAT       ; ! for generator under 1000
                       JUSTDUHAT        ; ! going via 1000
                       OVERDUHAT        ; ! for generator over 1000
                       OLD              ; ! for "thirteen hundred, etc.
                       num-imprecise    ;
                       num-collective   ;
                       ARABICS          ; ! for the arabic numerals
            +Use/Circ: ROMAN            ; ! for the roman numerals
 +Use/-Spell+Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES     ; ! for §34 etc.
            +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP  ; ! for ½ etc.
                       11TO99F          ;
                       21TO99           ;
                       DUHAT            ;
                       1TO9DUHAT        ;
                       O-NUPPELOHKAI    ;
                       NUPPELOHKAICUODI ;
                       NUPPELOHKAI      ;

LEXICON CmpNumeral   !!≈ The __@CODE@__  lexicon is the entrance for compounds
                     !!  with numbers. Introduced to restrict such compounding
                     !!  to a subgroup of numerals only, mainly to exclude
                     !!  roman numerals, that turned out to be too problematic.
                     !!  With this change, roman numerals are only recognised
                     !!  on their own.
                       num-imprecise    ;
                       num-collective   ;
            +Use/Circ: ARABIC           ;
                       UNDERDUHAT       ; ! for generator under 1000
                       11TO99F          ;
                       21TO99           ;
                       1TO9DUHAT        ;
                       O-NUPPELOHKAI    ;
                       NUPPELOHKAICUODI ;
                       NUPPELOHKAI      ;


! We now run through the alphabetic numerals, ending up with the case
! inflection of the final number.

! Million, a noun of its own
! --------------------------

LEXICON MILJON   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  miljons and miljards
miljovdna+v1:miljovdna OKTA ;
miljovdna+v2:millijovdna OKTA ;
miljovdna+Err/Orth:miljuvdna OKTA ;
miljovdna+Err/Orth:milliuvdna OKTA ;
miljovdna+Err/Orth:milljovdna OKTA ;
miljovdna+v3+Num+Sg+Nom:miljon K ;                !Num or N?
miljovdna+Num+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:miljun K ;                         !
miljovdna+Err/Orth:millijuvdna OKTA ;
miljovnnat+A+Ord:miljovnnag VUOSTTAS ;    ! This should NOT be N, since it is the starting point of the Ordinal
miljovnnat+A+Ord:millijovnnag VUOSTTAS ;
miljovnnat+A+Ord:miljonag VUOSTTAS ;
miljárda:miljár'da OKTA ;         !Num or N?
miljárda+Err/Orth:milliár'da OKTA ;         !
miljárda+Err/Orth:millijár'da OKTA ;         !
miljárda+Err/Orth:milliar'da OKTA ;         !
miljárddat+A+Ord:miljárddag VUOSTTAS ;



! Overduhat, for the numerals over 1000
! --------------------------------------

LEXICON OVERDUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ for the numerals over 1000. 
O-OKTAF ;
O-2TO9F ;
 O-JUSTLOGIF ; ! 10000
 O-2TO9LOG ;   ! 20000, 30000, ...
 O-NUPPELOT ;  ! 11000, 12000, ...
 O-CUODI ;     ! 100000
 O-2TO9CUO ;   ! 200000, 300000, ...




! Thousands

LEXICON O-OKTAF   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ All the child lexica of OVERDUHAT have the prefix O-. They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTDUHAT.
okta:okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta+Use/NG:akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
JUSTDUHAT ;
DUHAT ;


LEXICON O-2TO9F   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ All the child lexica of OVERDUHAT have the prefix O-. They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTDUHAT.
guokte:guokte#   JUSTDUHAT ;
golbma:golbma#   JUSTDUHAT ;
njeallje:njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
njeallje:njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
vihtta:vihtta#   JUSTDUHAT ;
guhtta:guhtta#   JUSTDUHAT ;
čieža:čieža#    JUSTDUHAT ;
čieža+Err/Orth:gieža#    JUSTDUHAT ;
gávcci:gávcci#   JUSTDUHAT ;
ovcci:ovcci#    JUSTDUHAT ;

LEXICON 1TO9DUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
oktaduhát:ok'ta OKTADUHAT ;
guokteduhát:guok't GUOKTEDUHAT ;
nubbeduhát:nubb NUBBEDUHAT ;
golbmaduhát:golbma GOLBMADUHAT ;
njealljeduhát:njeallj GUOKTEDUHAT ;
njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Nom:njeallja#duhát K ;
njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Acc:njeallja#duhát K ;
njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja#duhát K ;
njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Acc:njeallja#duháh%>a K ;
njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja#duháh%>a K ;
vihttaduhát:vi VIHTTADUHAT ;
guhttaduhát:gu VIHTTADUHAT ;
čiežaduhát:či CIEZADUHAT ;
giežaduhát:gi CIEZADUHAT ;
gávcciduhát:gák'ci GAVCCIDUHAT ;
ovcciduhát:ok'ci GAVCCIDUHAT ;



! Tens of thousands

LEXICON O-JUSTLOGIF   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ This lexicon is for the number 10 000 only. it is separated from the rest to avoid forms like *logivihttaduhát, etc.
logi:logi# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi:logi# DUHAT ;



LEXICON O-LOGIF   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ this lexicon is accessed only via other O-lexica, and not directly from OVERDUHAT. Thus, *logivihttaduhát, etc. is avoided.
logi:logi# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi:logi# DUHAT ;
logiokta:logi#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logiakta:logi#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logiguokte:logi#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
logigolbma:logi#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
loginjeallje:logi#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
loginjeallja:logi#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
logivihtta:logi#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logiguhtta:logi#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logičieža:logi#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
logigieža:logi#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
logigávcci:logi#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
logiovcci:logi#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
logiokta:logi#okta# DUHAT ;
logiakta:logi#akta# DUHAT ;
logiguokte:logi#guokte# DUHAT ;
logigolbma:logi#golbma# DUHAT ;
loginjeallje:logi#njeallje# DUHAT ;
loginjeallja:logi#njeallja# DUHAT ;
logivihtta:logi#vihtta# DUHAT ;
logiguhtta:logi#guhtta# DUHAT ;
logičieža:logi#čieža# DUHAT ;
logigieža:logi#gieža# DUHAT ;
logigávcci:logi#gávcci# DUHAT ;
logiovcci:logi#ovcci# DUHAT ;



LEXICON O-2TO9LOG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ All the child lexica of OVERDUHAT have the prefix O-. They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTDUHAT.
guokte:guokte# O-LOGIF ;
guoktelot:guokte#lot# DUHAT ;
guoktelot:guokte#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
golbma:golbma# O-LOGIF ;
golbmalot:golbma#lot# DUHAT ;
golbmalot:golbma#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
njeallje:njeallje# O-LOGIF ;
njealljelot:njeallje#lot# DUHAT ;
njealljelot:njeallje#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
njeallja:njeallja# O-LOGIF ;
njealljalot:njeallja#lot# DUHAT ;
njealljalot:njeallja#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
vihtta:vihtta# O-LOGIF ;
vihttalot:vihtta#lot# DUHAT ;
vihttalot:vihtta#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
guhtta:guhtta# O-LOGIF ;
guhttalot:guhtta#lot# DUHAT ;
guhttalot:guhtta#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
čieža:čieža# O-LOGIF ;
čiežalot:čieža#lot# DUHAT ;
čiežalot:čieža#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
gieža:gieža# O-LOGIF ;
giežalot:gieža#lot# DUHAT ;
giežalot:gieža#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
gávcci:gávcci# O-LOGIF ;
gávccilot:gávcci#lot# DUHAT ;
gávccilot:gávcci#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
ovcci:ovcci# O-LOGIF ;
ovccilot:ovcci#lot# DUHAT ;
ovccilot:ovcci#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;



LEXICON O-NUPPELOT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  Teens of thousands
okta:okta# O-NL ;
akta:akta# O-NL ;
guokte:guokte# O-NL ;
golbma:golbma# O-NL ;
njeallje:njeallje# O-NL ;
njeallja:njeallja# O-NL ;
vihtta:vihtta# O-NL ;
guhtta:guhtta# O-NL ;
čieža:čieža# O-NL ;
gieža:gieža# O-NL ;
gávcci:gávcci# O-NL ;
ovcci:ovcci# O-NL ;

LEXICON O-CUODI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ Hundreds of thousands
čuođi:čuođi# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
čuođi:čuođi# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
čuođi:čuođi# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
čuođi:čuođi# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
oktačuohti:okta#čuohti# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
oktačuohti:okta#čuohti# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
oktačuohti:okta#čuohti# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
oktačuohti:okta#čuohti# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
čuohte:čuohte# O-OKTAF ;
čuohti:čuohti# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
čuohti:čuohti# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
čuohti:čuohti# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
čuohti:čuohti# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
